Missouri, session 2026, HB1671.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 620.467, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 620.467, to read as follows:
620.467. 1. [The state treasurer shall annually deposit an amount prescribed in this
section out of the general revenue fund pursuant to section 144.700, in a fund] There is
hereby created in the state treasury a special fund, to be known as the "Division of Tourism
Supplemental Revenue Fund", which shall consist of all moneys which may be
appropriated to it by the general assembly, and also any gifts, contributions, grants,
or bequests received from federal, private, or other sources. The state treasurer shall
administer the fund, and the moneys in such fund[, except the appropriate percentage of any
refund made of taxes collected under the provisions of chapter 144,] shall be used solely by
the division of tourism of the department of economic development to carry out the duties and
functions of the division as prescribed by law. [Moneys deposited in the division of tourism
supplemental revenue fund shall be in addition to a budget base in each fiscal year. For fiscal
year 1994, such budget base shall be six million two hundred thousand dollars, and in each
succeeding fiscal year the budget base shall be the prior fiscal year's general revenue base
plus any additional appropriations made to the division of tourism, including one hundred
percent of the prior fiscal year's deposits made to the division of tourism supplemental
revenue fund pursuant to this section. The general revenue base shall decrease by ten percent
in each fiscal year following fiscal year 1994.] Notwithstanding the provisions of section
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1671 2
33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the division of tourism supplemental revenue fund at the
end of any biennium shall not be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund. The
state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the
fund.
2. [In fiscal years 1995 to 2020, a portion of general revenue determined pursuant to
this subsection shall be deposited to the credit of the division of tourism supplemental
revenue fund pursuant to subsection 1 of this section. The director of revenue shall determine
the amount deposited to the credit of the division of tourism supplemental revenue fund in
each fiscal year by computing the previous year's total appropriation into the division of
tourism supplemental revenue fund and adding to such appropriation amount the total amount
derived from the retail sale of tourist-oriented goods and services collected pursuant to the
following sales taxes: state sales taxes; sales taxes collected pursuant to sections 144.010 to
144.430 that are designated as local tax revenue to be deposited in the school district trust
fund pursuant to section 144.701; sales taxes collected pursuant to Section 43(a) of Article IV
of the Missouri Constitution; and sales taxes collected pursuant to Section 47(a) of Article IV
of the Missouri Constitution. If the increase in such sales taxes derived from the retail sale of
tourist-oriented goods and services in the fiscal year three years prior to the fiscal year in
which each deposit shall be made is at least three percent over such sales taxes derived from
the retail sale of tourist-oriented goods and services generated in the fiscal year four years
prior to the fiscal year in which each deposit shall be made, an amount equal to one-half of
such sales taxes generated above a three percent increase shall be calculated by the director of
revenue and the amount calculated shall be deposited by the state treasurer to the credit of the
division of tourism supplemental revenue fund.
3. Total deposits in the supplemental revenue fund in any fiscal year pursuant to
subsections 1 and 2 of this section shall not exceed the amount deposited into the division of
tourism supplemental revenue fund in the fiscal year immediately preceding the current fiscal
year by more than three million dollars.
4. As used in this section, "sales of tourism-oriented goods and services" are those
sales by businesses registered with the department of revenue under the following SIC Codes:
(1) SIC Code 5811;
(2) SIC Code 5812;
(3) SIC Code 5813;
(4) SIC Code 7010;
(5) SIC Code 7020;
(6) SIC Code 7030;
(7) SIC Code 7033;

HB 1671 3
(8) SIC Code 7041;
(9) SIC Code 7920;
(10) SIC Code 7940;
(11) SIC Code 7990;
(12) SIC Code 7991;
(13) SIC Code 7992;
(14) SIC Code 7996;
(15) SIC Code 7998;
(16) SIC Code 7999; and
(17) SIC Code 8420.
5.] Prior to each appropriation from the division of tourism supplemental revenue
fund, the division of tourism shall present to the special committee on tourism[, recreational
and cultural affairs] of the house of representatives and to the [transportation and tourism]
economic and workforce development committee of the senate, or their successors, a
promotional marketing strategy including, but not limited to, targeted markets, duration of
market plans, ensuing market strategies, and the actual and estimated investment return, if
any, resulting therefrom.
[6. This section shall become effective July 1, 1994. This section shall expire June 30,
2020.]
✔